Vermont, session 2025-2026, H288.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 378 is amended to read:
§ 378. VETERANS’ EXEMPTIONS
VT LEG #380632 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.288
2025 Page 2 of 4
(a) No fees shall be charged an honorably discharged to a veteran of the
U.S. Armed Forces who received a discharge under other than dishonorable
conditions and is a resident of the State of Vermont for the registration of a
motor vehicle that the veteran has acquired with financial assistance from the
U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, or for the registration of a motor vehicle
owned by him or her the veteran during his or her the veteran’s lifetime
obtained as a replacement thereof, when his or her the veteran’s application is
accompanied by a copy of an approved VA Form 21-4502 issued by the U.S.
Department of Veterans Affairs certifying him or her the veteran to be entitled
to the financial assistance.
(b) A veteran of the U.S. Armed Forces who received a discharge under
other than dishonorable conditions and is a resident of the State of Vermont
shall be entitled to a 50 percent reduction of the registration fees owed under
sections 361 (pleasure cars), 364 (motorcycles), 364a (motor-driven cycles),
364b (all-surface vehicles), 373 (exhibition vehicles), 382 (diesel-powered
pleasure cars), 3204 (snowmobiles), 3204a (antique snowmobiles),
3305 (motorboats), and 3504 (all-terrain vehicles) of this title and 3 V.S.A.
§ 2822(m) (Clean Air Fund) when the veteran’s registration form or renewal
registration form is accompanied by a copy of an approved DD Form 214.
This reduction in registration fees shall be available if the veteran is listed as
VT LEG #380632 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.288
2025 Page 3 of 4
an owner or co-owner of the motor vehicle on any registration forms filed with
the Department of Motor Vehicles.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, a veteran of the U.S.
Armed Forces who received a discharge under other than dishonorable
conditions and is a resident of the State of Vermont shall be entitled to one 100
percent reduction of the registration fees listed in subsection (b) per calendar
year when the veteran’s registration form or renewal registration form is
accompanied by a copy of an approved DD Form 214, provided that the
veteran is not already receiving a fee exemption under subsection (a) of this
section. This reduction in registration fees shall be available if the veteran is
listed as an owner or co-owner of the motor vehicle on any registration forms
filed with the Department of Motor Vehicles.
Sec. 2. 31 V.S.A. § 1304 is amended to read
§ 1304. ALLOCATION OF REVENUES TO SPORTS WAGERING
ENTERPRISE FUND
The revenues and fees received by the Department pursuant to this chapter
shall be deposited in the Sports Wagering Enterprise Fund, except for an
amount necessary to offset the amount of foregone vehicle registration fees
pursuant to 23 V.S.A. § 378, which shall be deposited in the Transportation
Fund.
VT LEG #380632 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.288
2025 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
VT LEG #380632 v.1